Tennessee, session 114, SB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-113, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (b) and redesignating the existing subsection (b) accordingly:
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the officers and employees of the various
agencies, boards, and departments of state government identified in §§ 8-30-102(a), 8-
30-102(b)(2)-(11), and 8-30-102(b)(13) must be granted:
(1) Three (3) days paid leave in the event of the death of such officers' or
employees' siblings, grandparents, grandchildren, foster parents, or parents-in-
law;
(2) Five (5) days paid leave in the event of the death of such officers' or
employees' parents or stepparents; and
(3) Ten (10) days paid leave in the event of the death of such officers' or
employees' spouse, children, or stepchildren.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1285
000563
- 1 -